Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.970

Federal requirements for receipt of federal funds.

If any part of this chapter is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements which are a prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the state, or to any departments or agencies thereof, such conflicting part of this chapter is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict. No such ruling shall affect the operation of the remainder of this chapter. Any internal reorganization carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal requirements which are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 239 s 20.]